Massachusetts, session 194th, H5129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Notwithstanding section 10 of chapter 39 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law or town by-law or charter provision to the contrary, all acts, proceedings
and votes taken by the town of Stow at its special town meeting on October 27, 2025, and all
actions taken pursuant thereto, are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed to the same extent as
if notice of the meeting had been posted and published as required by law.
SECTION 2: This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1